Nevada, session 83, AB372.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 293.485 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.485 1. [Every] Only a citizen of the United States, 18
years of age or over, who has continuously resided in this State and
in the county 30 days and in the precinct 10 days next preceding the
day of the next succeeding:
(a) Primary election;
(b) Primary city election;
(c) Presidential preference primary election;
(d) General election; or
(e) General city election,
 and who has registered in the manner provided in this chapter, is
entitled to vote at that election.
2. This section does not exclude the registration of eligible
persons whose 18th birthday or the date of whose completion of the
required residence occurs on or before the next succeeding:
(a) Primary election;
-
*AB372*

– 2 –
(b) Primary city election;
(c) Presidential preference primary election;
(d) General election;
(e) General city election; or
(f) Any other election.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB372*